Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-404. Applications for ballots — Definition.

(a)(1)(A)

Applications for absentee ballots must be signed by the applicant and verified by the county clerk by checking the voter's name, address, date of birth, and signature from the registration records unless the application is sent by electronic means.

(B)

If the application is sent by electronic means, the application must bear a verifiable facsimile of the applicant's signature.

(2)(A)

If the signatures on the absentee ballot application and the voter registration record are not similar, the county clerk shall not provide an absentee ballot to the voter.

(B)

If the absentee ballot request is rejected under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, the county clerk shall:

(i)

Provide notice promptly to the voter of the rejection;

(ii)

Allow the voter to resubmit the request; and

(iii)

Electronically record the rejection in the permanent system maintained by the county clerk.

(C)

The notice to the voter under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section shall be made by:

(i)

The most efficient means available, including without limitation by telephone or email; and

(ii)

Written notice sent by first-class mail to the address where the voter is registered to vote.

(3)

Delivery of the request for an absentee ballot to the county clerk may be made in one (1) of the following ways, and in no other manner:

(A)

For applications submitted using the form prescribed in §7-5-405:

(i)

In person at the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter no later than the time the county clerk's office regularly closes on the day before election day;

(ii)

Applications by mail must be received in the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later than seven (7) days before the election for which the application was made;

(iii)

A designated bearer may deliver the completed application to the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the applicant not later than the time the county clerk's office regularly closes on the day before the day of the election;

(iv)

A person declared as the authorized agent of the applicant may deliver the application to the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the applicant not later than 1:30 p.m. on the day of the election;

(v)

An administrator may deliver the application in person at the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter no later than the time the county clerk's office regularly closes on the day before election day; or

(vi)

(a)

Delivery by electronic means to the county clerk's office of the county of residence of the voter not later than seven (7) days before the election for which the application was made.

(b)

The completed application sent by electronic means will be accepted only upon verification of the facsimile signature of the applicant by the county clerk.

(c)

Once verified as a reasonable likeness of the voter's signature, the signature appearing on a copy of an application sent by electronic means shall be presumed to be authentic until proven otherwise; or

(B)

If the applicant does not use the form prescribed in §7-5-405, he or she may make an application for an absentee ballot as follows:

(i)

A letter or postcard must be received in the office of the county clerk not later than seven (7) days before the date of the election. The letter or postcard shall contain information sufficient for the county board of election commissioners and the county clerk to accept the letter or postcard in lieu of the application form; or

(ii)

An applicant may transmit a written request for an absentee ballot by electronic means that shall contain the voter's signature and other information sufficient for acceptance in lieu of the application form.

(b)(1)

Any person eligible to vote by absentee ballot may request the county clerk to mail to an address within the continental United States an application for an absentee ballot.

(2)(A)

For those persons voting by absentee ballot who reside outside the county in which they are registered to vote, the application shall remain in effect for one (1) year unless revoked by the voter, and the county clerk shall thereafter automatically mail no later than twenty-five (25) days before each election an absentee ballot for each election.

(B)(i)

For those persons voting by absentee ballot who reside within the county in which they are registered to vote, the application shall be valid for only one (1) election cycle.

(ii)

The election cycle shall include any one (1) election and the corresponding runoff election.

(C)(i)

For a voter residing in a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state the application shall remain in effect for one (1) calendar year unless withdrawn by the voter.

(ii)

The county clerk automatically shall mail no later than twenty-five (25) days before each election an absentee ballot for each election unless, before mailing, the administrator of the facility has presented an absentee ballot request from the voter authorizing the administrator to receive the absentee ballot on behalf of the voter for that election.

(D)(i)

For a voter with a disability as defined in §7-5-311, the application shall remain in effect for one (1) calendar year unless withdrawn by the voter.

(ii)

The county clerk automatically shall mail no later than twenty-five (25) days before each election an absentee ballot for each election.

(c)

The following may request an absentee ballot for one (1) or more elections, up to and including the next regularly scheduled general election for federal office, including without limitation any runoff elections that may occur as a result of the outcome of the general elections, by submitting one (1) application during that period of time in the manner provided under subsection (a) of this section:

(1)

A citizen of the United States temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States;

(2)

A member of the uniformed services of the United States while in active duty or service, including his or her spouse or dependent, who by reason of active duty or service of the member is absent from the place of residence where the member, spouse, or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote;

(3)

A member of the United States Merchant Marine while in active duty or service, including his or her spouse or dependent, who by reason of the active duty or service of the member is absent from the place of residence where the member, spouse, or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote; and

(4)

A member of the Arkansas National Guard while in state active duty or service, including his or her spouse or dependent, who by reason of state active duty or service of the member is absent from the place of residence where the member, spouse, or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote.

(d)

As used in this section, “electronic means” means a scanned image sent by:

(1)

Electronic mail; or

(2)

Facsimile machine.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 4; 1981, No. 685, § 1; 1983, No. 430, § 1; 1985, No. 1019, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-904; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 9; 1987, No. 843, § 1; 1991, No. 863, § 1; 1993, No. 303, § 1; 1993, No. 1201, § 1; 1995, No. 686, § 3; 1995, No. 948, § 3; 1997, No. 1092, § 1; 1999, No. 1111, § 1; 1999, No. 1538, §§ 2, 3; 2003, No. 994, § 8; 2005, No. 67, § 11; 2007, No. 543, § 1; 2007, No. 556, § 3; 2009, No. 250, § 4; 2009, No. 959, § 16; 2011, No. 1188, § 1;
2013, No. 1424, § 3; 2019, No. 462, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was formerly codified as §7-5-403.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §7-5-404, concerning voting by mail, was repealed by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 686 and 948, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 16; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-916.

Former §
7-5-403 has been renumbered by Acts 2009, No. 959, § 16 as §7-5-404.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 redesignated the last sentence of (b)(2)(B) as (b)(2)(B)(ii), redesignated the remainder of (b)(2)(B) accordingly, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 inserted (a)(2)(A)(v) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly and made a related change; and made a minor stylistic change in (b)(2)(A).

The 2011 amendment substituted “by electronic means” for “by facsimile machine transmitted over telephone lines” in (a)(1); substituted “by electronic means” for “by facsimile machine transmission” in (a)(2)(A)(vi)

(a)

; substituted “application sent by electronic means” for “facsimile-transmitted application” in (a)(2)(A)(vi)

(b)

; substituted “a copy of an application sent by electronic means” for “a facsimile copy of an application” in (a)(2)(A)(vi)

(c)

; substituted “by electronic means” for “over the telephone lines” in (a)(2)(B)(ii); rewrote (c); and added (d).

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as present (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3) and inserted (a)(2); substituted “unless the application is sent by electronic means” for “or, if” in (a)(1)(A); inserted “If the application is” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “For” for “Except for persons of long term care or residential facilities licensed by the state or other persons who are voters with disabilities as defined in §7-5-311(d), for” in (b)(2)(B)(i); added (b)(2)(C) and (b)(2)(D); and, in (c), deleted “two (2)” following “the next” and substituted “election” for “elections”.

The 2019 amendment added (c)(4).

7-5-405. Application form.

(a)(1)

Applications for absentee ballots may be made on a form or forms prescribed by the Secretary of State and furnished by the county clerk at least sixty (60) days before the election.

(2)

The form or forms shall contain the following information:

(A)

The following statement:

“IF YOU PROVIDE FALSE INFORMATION ON THIS FORM, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF PERJURY AND SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO $10,000 OR IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO 10 YEARS.”;

(B)

A statement in which the voter must indicate that he or she is requesting an absentee ballot because he or she will be:

(i)

Unavoidably absent from the polling site on election day;

(ii)

Unable to attend the polls on election day because of illness or physical disability; or

(iii)

Unable to attend the polls on election day because of residence in a long-term care or residential facility licensed by the state;

(C)

A statement by the voter indicating whether he or she resides outside the county;

(D)

A statement indicating whether the voter is a United States citizen residing outside the territorial limits of the United States;

(E)

A statement indicating whether the voter is in active service as a member of the armed services of the United States;

(F)

Mailing information for the ballot or the name and signature of a designated bearer, an administrator, or an authorized agent;

(G)

The date, the voter's printed or typed name, voting residence address, date of birth, and the voter's signature attesting to the correctness of the information provided under penalty of perjury; and

(H)

The election in which the voter wishes to cast an absentee ballot.

(3)(A)

The form or forms shall contain a portion to include a sworn statement that may be completed by a voter stating that the voter is registered to vote and that he or she is the person who is registered.

(B)

The sworn statement portion of the form or forms under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section is not required to be notarized but shall be executed by the voter under penalty of perjury.

(b)

The Secretary of State may prescribe separate absentee ballot application forms for:

(1)(A)

Persons who reside within the county in which they are registered to vote and will be unavoidably absent from the polls on the date of the election.

(B)

The application shall be valid for one (1) election cycle, which includes any one (1) election and the corresponding runoff election;

(2)(A)

Persons whose application would be valid for one (1) calendar year.

(B)

This includes the following:

(i)

Persons who reside outside the county in which they are registered to vote;

(ii)

Persons in long-term care or residential facilities licensed by the state; and

(iii)

Voters with disabilities; and

(3)

Persons whose applications would be valid through the next regularly scheduled general election for federal office, including any resulting runoff elections.

(c)

Any person may distribute blank applications for absentee ballots.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 5; 1971, No. 184, § 2; 1983, No. 430, § 2; 1985, No. 1019, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-905; Acts 1987, No. 843, § 2; 1989, No. 912, § 7; 1993, No. 303, § 2; 1993, No. 1201, § 2; 1995, No. 686, § 5; 1995, No. 948, § 5; 1997, No. 1092, § 2; 1999, No. 918, § 1; 2001, No. 1789, § 9; 2003, No. 1202, § 1; 2003, No. 1275, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 12; 2007, No. 543, § 3; 2007, No. 556, § 4; 2009, No. 250, §§ 5, 6; 2011, No. 1188, § 2; 2013, No. 1424, § 4; 2017, No. 633, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “armed” for “uniformed” in (a)(2)(E); and substituted “an absentee ballot” for “a ballot” in (a)(2)(H).

The 2011 amendment deleted former (b)(3)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivision as (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment, in (b)(3), deleted “two (2)” following “the next” and substituted “election” for “elections”.

The 2017 amendment added (a)(3).

7-5-406. Members of uniformed services and other citizens residing outside the United States.

(a)

Any qualified elector of this state in any of the following categories who is absent from the place of his or her voting residence may make a request for an absentee ballot by submission of a federal postal card application as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act and may vote without prior registration by regular absentee ballot or by Federal Write-in Absentee Ballot in any election held in his or her election precinct if he or she is otherwise eligible to vote in that election:

(1)

Members of the uniformed services of the United States while in active duty or service, and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouses or dependents are otherwise qualified to vote;

(2)

Members of the United States Merchant Marine while in active duty or service and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouses or dependents are otherwise qualified to vote;

(3)

Citizens of the United States residing or temporarily outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia; and

(4)

Members of the Arkansas National Guard while in state active duty or service, and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the state active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouses or dependents are otherwise qualified to vote.

(b)(1)

The ballot or ballots shall be transmitted according to state laws or rules and federal laws, rules, and regulations.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall establish and transmit to each county clerk and each county board of election commissioners procedures in accordance with state and federal law that:

(A)

Allow absent uniformed services voters and absent overseas voters to request, either by mail or electronically, voter registration applications and absentee ballot applications for all elections in the state;

(B)

Allow county clerks to send by mail or electronically, in accordance with the preferred method of transmission designated by the absent uniformed services voter or absent overseas voter, voter registration applications and absentee ballot applications;

(C)

Allow the absent uniformed services voter or absent overseas voter to designate whether the voter prefers that the voter registration application or absentee ballot application be transmitted by mail or electronically;

(D)

Allow the transmission by mail and, to the extent funding is available, electronically of blank absentee ballots to absent uniformed services voters and absent overseas voters for all elections in the state in a manner that expedites the transmission of absentee ballots;

(E)

Allow county clerks and county boards of election commissioners to accept and process marked absentee ballots of absent uniformed services voters and absent overseas voters;

(F)

Ensure, to the extent practicable, the protection of the security and integrity of the voter registration and absentee ballot request process and the privacy of the identity and other personal data of an absent uniformed services voter or absent overseas voter who requests or is sent a voter registration application, absentee ballot application, or absentee ballot throughout the process of making a request or being sent an application or ballot; and

(G)

Establish, to the extent funding is available, a free access system by which an absent uniformed services voter or absent overseas voter may determine whether the absentee ballot of the absent uniformed services voter or absent overseas voter has been received by the appropriate election official.

(3)

The Secretary of State shall:

(A)

Provide each county clerk and each county board of election commissioners with written copies of the procedures under subdivision (b)(2) of this section by February 1 of each even-numbered year; and

(B)

Promptly notify each county clerk and each county board of election commissioners of changes in relevant laws, rules, federal regulations, or procedures.

(4)

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this title, if selected by any grantor, this state or any county in this state may participate in a Federal Voting Assistance Program project which allows members of the uniformed services and voters overseas to register to vote and to vote in elections electronically, according to state laws and rules, and federal laws, rules, and regulations, if funds are available.

(c)(1)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section, for the qualified electors in the categories named in subsection (a) of this section who are temporarily outside the territorial limits of the United States, the county board of election commissioners shall prepare a special absentee ballot for each preferential primary and general election to be sent to the voter in addition to the regular absentee ballot.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners shall not prepare a special absentee ballot for a nonpartisan judicial election.

(2)(A)

The special absentee ballot shall contain a list of all offices contested by three (3) or more candidates and the candidates qualifying for the election in each office.

(B)

The special absentee ballot shall permit the elector to vote in the general primary election or in a general runoff election by indicating his or her order of preference for each candidate for each office.

(C)(i)

To indicate his or her order of preference for each candidate for each office, the voter shall put the number one (1) next to the name of the candidate who is the voter's first choice, the number two (2) for the voter's second choice, and so forth, so that, in consecutive numerical order, a number indicating the voter's preference is written by the voter next to the candidate's name on the ballot.

(ii)

However, the voter shall not be required to indicate his or her preference for more than one (1) candidate on the ballot if he or she chooses.

(3)

The special absentee ballot shall be marked as a “special runoff ballot”.

(4)

Instructions shall be sent with the special absentee ballot to the voter explaining the special runoff voting process.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, §§ 5, 7, 8; 1971, No. 184, § 2; 1971, No. 261, §§ 25, 26; 1977, No. 739, § 1; 1983, No. 430, §§ 2, 4; 1985, No. 1019, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-905, 3-907, 3-908; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 3; 2001, No. 1180, § 1; 2003, No. 107, § 1; 2003, No. 749, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 9; 2005, No. 751, § 1; 2007, No. 233, § 1; 2007, No. 261, § 1; 2007, No. 556, §§ 5, 6; 2009, No. 250, §§ 7, 8; 2009, No. 659, § 6; 2009, No. 703, § 1; 2011, No. 1188, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 417-419; 2019, No. 462, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 233 substituted “contested by three (3) or more candidates” for “being contested” in (c)(2)(A).

The 2007 amendment by No. 261 substituted “temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States” for “active duty military personnel stationed overseas” in (c)(1).

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 substituted “and other” for “and merchant marine and” in the section heading; in (a)(1), deleted “while” following “States” and deleted “and their spouses and dependents” following “service”; deleted former (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(3) as present (a)(2); deleted “and the District of Columbia and their spouses and dependents when residing with or accompanying them” following the second occurrence of “States” in (a)(2); and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 substituted “armed” for “uniformed” in (a)(1); and deleted “qualified” preceding “voter” in (c)(4).

The 2009 amendment by No. 659 substituted “and may vote without prior registration by regular absentee ballot or by federal Write-in Absentee Ballot in any election” for “or may use the federal Write-in Absentee ballot and may vote by absentee ballot, without registering, in any primary, special, runoff or general election” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote” in (a)(1);
inserted (a)(2) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly; substituted “residing or temporarily outside” for “temporarily residing outside” in (a)(3); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 703 deleted “residing” following “citizens” in the introductory language of (c); inserted (c)(1)(B); inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section” in (c)(1)(A); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “state and federal laws, rules, and regulations” for “federal regulations” in the introductory language of (b)(1) and in (b)(4); rewrote the introductory language of (b)(2) and inserted (b)(2)(A) through (b)(2)(G) and (b)(3); in (b)(4), substituted “any grantor” for “the United States Department of Defense” and substituted “a Federal Voting Assistance Program project” for “the Federal Voting Assistance Program's pilot project”; and substituted “special” for “instant” in (c)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “laws or rules” in (b)(1); inserted “federal” in (b)(3)(B); and inserted “laws and rules” following “state” in (b)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 462 added (a)(4).

U.S. Code.

The Uniformed and Overseas Citizen Absentee Voting Act, referred to in (a), is codified at 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.

7-5-407. Preparation and delivery of ballots.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall prepare official absentee ballots and deliver them to the county clerk for mailing to all qualified applicants as soon as practicable but not later than forty-seven (47) days before a preferential primary election, general election, school election, nonpartisan general election, nonpartisan runoff election, or special election.

(2)

Upon the receipt of the absentee ballots, the county clerk shall begin delivering ballots to absentee voters as soon as practicable and, no later than forty-six (46) days before the applicable election, shall deliver ballots to those absentee voters who made timely application under:

(A)

Section 7-5-406; or

(B)

The Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., as existing on January 1, 2011.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall prepare official absentee ballots and deliver them to the county clerk for mailing to any qualified applicant as soon as practicable but in any event not later than ten (10) days before all other elections not included in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 2; 1971, No. 261, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-902; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 4; 1999, No. 649, § 1; 2001, No. 1789, § 10; 2007, No. 1049, § 17; 2011, No. 1185, § 7; 2013, No. 1110, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “forty-seven (47)” for “thirty-five (35)” in (a)(1); and inserted (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “in any event” following “practicable but” once, “judicial” following “nonpartisan” twice, and “any” following “runoff election, or” once.

7-5-408. List of applications — Preparation, preservation, and inspection.

(a)

The county clerk shall make a list of the applications for absentee ballots as the applications are received and shall keep the list of applications and retain the application forms after the election in which they are to be used for the same period as is required for retaining ballots.

(b)

When each absentee ballot is returned to the county clerk, the clerk shall indicate on the list of applications that the absentee ballot was returned.

(c)

The list and applications shall be available to public inspection during regular business hours from sixty (60) days prior to the election until they are destroyed.

(d)(1)

The county clerk shall record in the electronic voter registration system the date the county clerk receives the voter's:

(A)

Absentee ballot application; and

(B)

Absentee ballot.

(2)

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(3) of this section, during the sixty (60) days before election day, the county clerk shall record in the electronic voter registration system:

(A)

Within one (1) business day after the receipt of the voter's absentee ballot, the date the county clerk received the voter's absentee ballot; and

(B)

Within two (2) business days after receipt of the voter's absentee ballot application, the date the county clerk received the absentee ballot application.

(3)

If a voter's absentee ballot is received by the county clerk on election day, the county clerk immediately shall record the date the absentee ballot was received.

(4)

The county clerk shall not provide an absentee ballot to an election official for counting unless the ballot has been marked as received in the electronic voter registration system.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 6; 1983, No. 430, § 3; 1985, No. 567, § 5; 1985, No. 568, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-906; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 5; 2013, No. 1424, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (b) and (d) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

7-5-409. Materials furnished to qualified voters.

(a)(1)(A)

The county clerk must satisfy himself or herself that the applicant for an absentee ballot is a qualified registered elector in the ward, precinct, or township in which he or she claims to be a resident or that the applicant does not require prior registration under §7-5-406.

(B)

The county clerk shall verify that the application has been properly signed by the applicant and, if necessary, the designated bearer, administrator, or authorized agent. If the application is not properly signed, the application shall be rejected by the county clerk.

(C)

The county clerk shall notify the applicant of the reason for the rejection.

(2)

If the county clerk is unable to contact the applicant to cure the deficiency, the county clerk shall forward the application with the reason for the rejection to the county board of election commissioners. The county board of election commissioners shall determine whether the applicant is a qualified elector.

(b)

If the applicant is registered or is otherwise eligible to vote absentee, the county clerk, prior to mailing or delivering the ballot, shall detach the ballot stub and deposit the ballot stub into a sealed box designated as “Absentee Stub Box” and deliver to the applicant or to the applicant's designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator for delivery to the applicant the following materials:

(1)

An official absentee ballot for each election named in the application;

(2)

Instructions for voting and returning the official absentee ballot to the county clerk;

(3)

An official absentee ballot secrecy envelope on which there shall be written or printed the words “Ballot Only”;

(4)(A)(i)

A voter statement.

(ii)

The voter statement shall include the following heading in bold capitalized letters:

“THIS VOTER STATEMENT MUST BE COMPLETED AND RETURNED IN THE MAILING ENVELOPE OR THE ABSENTEE BALLOT WILL NOT BE COUNTED.”

(iii)

The voter statement shall include the following statement in bold capitalized letters at the bottom of the page:

“THE INFORMATION I HAVE PROVIDED IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF MY KNOWLEDGE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY. IF I HAVE PROVIDED FALSE INFORMATION, I MAY BE SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS ($10,000) OR IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO TEN (10) YEARS, OR BOTH, UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAWS.”

(iv)

The voter statement shall include a statement that the voter resides at the address on his or her application.

(v)

The voter statement shall include a statement for a first-time voter who registers by mail: “If I am a newly registered voter of this county and this is the first time I am voting in this county, I am enclosing a copy of a current and valid photo identification card or a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows my name and address.”

(B)

Blanks shall be provided for the voter to provide his or her printed name, signature, address, date of birth, printed name and address of the administrator, authorized agent, or designated bearer, signature of administrator, authorized agent, or designated bearer, and address of the administrator, authorized agent, or designated bearer;

(C)(i)

The voter statement shall include a sworn statement portion that may be completed by the voter stating that the voter is registered to vote and that he or she is the person who is registered.

(ii)

The sworn statement portion of the voter statement is not required to be notarized, but the voter shall execute the sworn statement under penalty of perjury;

(5)

A sealable envelope upon which shall be printed or written the words: “Return Envelope”, the address of the county clerk, the precinct of the voter, and the words: “ABSENTEE BALLOT,
,
, ELECTION”; and

(6)

An authorized agent authorization form, as follows:

“AGENT AUTHORIZATION FORM

If applicable, fill out and sign this form and place it in the Return Envelope

I hereby authorize
(insert his or her name) as my authorized agent, to deliver this ballot as I am medically unable to vote on election day. An affidavit verifying my medical status as unable to deliver the application or to vote on the day of the election is attached or has been provided with my application.

Signature of voter

Printed name of voter

Address of voter

Date of birth of voter.”

(c)(1)

Except for absentee ballots mailed to an address outside the county in which the applicant is registered, an absentee ballot shall be mailed to the address that appears on the applicant's registration record or absentee ballot application if the voter is temporarily at a different address.

(2)

The county clerk shall not mail more than two (2) absentee ballots to the same address unless:

(A)

The address is outside the territorial limits of the United States;

(B)

The address is for a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state; or

(C)

There are more than two (2) persons lawfully registered at the same address.

(d)

The county clerk shall not deliver an absentee ballot to any person other than the absentee voter unless the person picking up the ballot provides current and valid photographic identification to the county clerk that he or she is:

(1)

The voter's:

(A)

Designated bearer; or

(B)

Authorized agent; or

(2)

The administrator of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state in which the voter resides.

(e)

The county clerk shall not provide more than two (2) absentee ballots per election to any designated bearer or authorized agent, nor shall the county clerk accept delivery of more than two (2) absentee ballots per election from any designated bearer or authorized agent.

(f)

A designated bearer shall be allowed to pick up only two (2) absentee ballots from the county clerk only during the fifteen (15) days prior to a school election, special election, preferential primary election, or general election and seven (7) days prior to a runoff election, including a general primary election.

(g)

Upon delivery of an absentee ballot to an individual authorized to receive an absentee ballot, the county clerk shall mark the electronic voter registration list and the precinct voter registration list to indicate that an absentee ballot has been delivered to the voter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 7; 1971, No. 261, § 25; 1983, No. 430, § 4; 1985, No. 567, § 3; 1985, No. 568, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-907; Acts 1987, No. 843, § 3; 1989, No. 912, § 8; 1993, No. 1201, § 3; 1995, No. 103, § 1; 1997, No. 1092, § 6; 1999, No. 918, § 2; 1999, No. 1243, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 1344, § 1; 1999, No. 1538, § 1; 2001, No. 1379, § 1; 2003, No. 647, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 10; 2003, No. 1202, § 2; 2003, No. 1275, §§ 2, 3; 2005, No. 880, § 4; 2005, No. 2193, § 3; 2007, No. 543, § 4; 2007, No. 556, § 7; 2009, No. 26, § 2; 2009, No. 250, §§ 9, 10; 2009, No. 375, § 2; 2013, No. 1424, §§ 6-8; 2017, No. 633, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The amendment of subdivision (b)(5) of this section by Acts 2003, No. 647, conflicted with the amendments to the subdivision by Acts 2003, Nos. 994, 1202, and 1275. Consequently, pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment was not implemented.

Acts 2003, No. 647 amended (b)(5) to read as follows:

“A blank voter statement in the following form:

“‘I reside at the address indicate on my application.

“I have enclosed my ballot stub and my marked ballot in the envelope. I will not vote again in this election.

“THE INFORMATION I HAVE PROVIDED IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF MY KNOWLEDGE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY. IF I HAVE PROVIDED FALSE INFORMATION, I MAY BE SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS ($10,000) OR IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO TEN (10) YEARS, OR BOTH, UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAWS.

“signature of voter

“printed name of voter

“address of voter

“date of birth of voter

“signature of designated bearer, relative or authorized agent

“address of designated bearer, relative or authorized agent; and”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 543 substituted “the voter's designated bearer, authorized agent, or the administrator of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state” for “the person authorized by the absentee voter to pick up the ballots” in (d); deleted former (e) and (g) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “or authorized agent” twice in present (e); and rewrote present (f).

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 substituted “or to the applicant's designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator for delivery to the applicant” for “or deliver pursuant to subsections (d)-(f) of this section to the person who delivers the application to the office of the county clerk pursuant to §7-5-403” in (b); rewrote (b)(4)(A); deleted “and the District of Columbia” following “States” in (c)(2)(A); in (h), inserted “school election, special election” and “primary election” and substituted “ a runoff election, including a general primary election” for “a general primary election”; and substituted “that an absentee ballot has been delivered to the voter” for “that the individual has received an absentee ballot” in (i).

The 2009 amendment by No. 26, in (f), deleted “presidential preferential primary election” preceding “or general election,” and made a minor punctuation change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250, in the introductory language of (d), substituted “current and valid photographic” for “satisfactory photo,” redesignated the last phrase as (d)(1) and (d)(2), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 375 deleted “presidential preferential primary election” following “preferential primary election” in (f), and made a related change.

The 2013 amendment substituted “does not require prior” for “is exempted from” in (a)(1)(A); inserted “printed name and address of the administrator, authorized agent, or designated bearer” in (b)(4)(B); and inserted “electronic voter registration list and the” in (g).

The 2017 amendment added (b)(4)(C).

7-5-410. Instructions and notice included with voting materials — Other enclosures prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place any notice, advertising material, or other advice with the material delivered or mailed to the applicant, other than instructions as to the method of casting an absentee ballot including a procedure to be followed by absentee voters such as express information covering the type or types of writing instruments which may be used to mark the absentee ballot, preferably pen or indelible pencil, the consequences of voting for more than one (1) candidate for a particular office, and notice of the last day on which the ballot may be received and counted. The instructions and notice shall not be signed by the name of any person.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 9; 1971, No. 261, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-909; Acts 2009, No. 959, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “in instances of adhesion of the balloting materials, a notation of the fact on the back of the envelope duly signed by the voter and witnessing officer” following “such as,” inserted “the consequences of voting for more than one (1) candidate for a particular office,” and made related changes.